Washington statutes.
RCW 24.36.350

Powers relating to real or personal property.

An association may buy, hold and exercise all privileges or ownership, over such real or personal property as may be necessary or convenient for the conduct and operation of any of the business of the association, or incidental thereto.

[ 1959 c 312 s 35.]